Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2010
Local law enforcement agency; duties.

Any local law enforcement agency notified pursuant to the Missing Children Identification Act of the request for the birth certificate, school record, or other information concerning a missing person shall immediately notify the patrol of such request and shall investigate such matter.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 10.